Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-57] No invalidation based on
erroneous placement or retention of specimens, samples, or print impressions. The
detention, arrest, wardship, adjudication, or conviction of a person based upon
a data bank match or database information is not invalidated if it is
determined that the specimens, samples, or print impressions were obtained or
placed or retained in a data bank or database by mistake. [L 2005, c 112, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next